gc_lang/fr/oxt/Dictionnaires/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX xA N 42
SFX xA roire royant croire
SFX xA roire ru croire
SFX xA roire rus croire
SFX xA roire rue croire
SFX xA roire rues croire
SFX xA roire rois croire
SFX xA roire roit croire
SFX xA roire royons croire
SFX xA roire royez croire
SFX xA roire roient croire
SFX xA roire royais croire
SFX xA roire royait croire
SFX xA roire royions croire
SFX xA roire royiez croire
SFX xA roire royaient croire
SFX xA roire rus croire
SFX xA roire rut croire
SFX xA roire rûmes croire
SFX xA roire rûtes croire
SFX xA roire rurent croire
SFX xA roire roirai croire
SFX xA roire roiras croire
SFX xA roire roira croire
SFX xA roire roirons croire
SFX xA roire roirez croire
SFX xA roire roiront croire
SFX xA roire roirais croire
SFX xA roire roirait croire
SFX xA roire roirions croire
SFX xA roire roiriez croire
SFX xA roire roiraient croire
SFX xA roire roie croire
SFX xA roire roies croire
SFX xA roire russe croire
SFX xA roire russes croire
SFX xA roire rût croire
SFX xA roire russions croire
SFX xA roire russiez croire
SFX xA roire russent croire
SFX xA roire rois croire
SFX xA roire royons croire
SFX xA roire royez croire

SFX xC N 42
SFX xC oire uvant boire
SFX xC oire u boire
SFX xC oire us boire
SFX xC oire ue boire
SFX xC oire ues boire
SFX xC oire ois boire
SFX xC oire oit boire
SFX xC oire uvons boire
SFX xC oire uvez boire
SFX xC oire oivent boire
SFX xC oire uvais boire
SFX xC oire uvait boire
SFX xC oire uvions boire
SFX xC oire uviez boire
SFX xC oire uvaient boire
SFX xC oire us boire
SFX xC oire ut boire
SFX xC oire ûmes boire
SFX xC oire ûtes boire
SFX xC oire urent boire
SFX xC oire oirai boire
SFX xC oire oiras boire
SFX xC oire oira boire
SFX xC oire oirons boire
SFX xC oire oirez boire
SFX xC oire oiront boire
SFX xC oire oirais boire
SFX xC oire oirait boire
SFX xC oire oirions boire
SFX xC oire oiriez boire
SFX xC oire oiraient boire
SFX xC oire oive boire
SFX xC oire oives boire
SFX xC oire usse boire
SFX xC oire usses boire
SFX xC oire ût boire
SFX xC oire ussions boire
SFX xC oire ussiez boire
SFX xC oire ussent boire
SFX xC oire ois boire
SFX xC oire uvons boire
SFX xC oire uvez boire

SFX xD Y 43
SFX xD boire boire/m't's' boire
SFX xD boire buvant/m't's' boire
SFX xD boire bu boire
SFX xD boire bus boire
SFX xD boire bue boire
SFX xD boire bues boire
SFX xD boire bois/m't' boire
SFX xD boire boit/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvons boire
SFX xD boire buvez boire
SFX xD boire boivent/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvais/m't' boire
SFX xD boire buvait/s' boire
SFX xD boire buvions boire
SFX xD boire buviez boire
SFX xD boire buvaient/s' boire
SFX xD boire bus/m't' boire
SFX xD boire but/s' boire
SFX xD boire bûmes boire
SFX xD boire bûtes boire
SFX xD boire burent/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirai/m' boire
SFX xD boire boiras/t' boire
SFX xD boire boira/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirons boire
SFX xD boire boirez boire
SFX xD boire boiront/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirais/m't' boire
SFX xD boire boirait/s' boire
SFX xD boire boirions boire
SFX xD boire boiriez boire
SFX xD boire boiraient/s' boire
SFX xD boire boive/m's' boire
SFX xD boire boives/t' boire
SFX xD boire busse/m' boire
SFX xD boire busses/t' boire
SFX xD boire bût/s' boire
SFX xD boire bussions boire
SFX xD boire bussiez boire
SFX xD boire bussent/s' boire
SFX xD boire bois/t' boire
SFX xD boire buvons boire
SFX xD boire buvez boire

SFX xJ N 3
SFX xJ clure clus clure
SFX xJ clure cluse clure
SFX xJ clure cluses clure

SFX xK Y 40
SFX xK clure clure/n'q'd'l'm't's' clure
SFX xK clure cluant/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xK clure clus/L'D'Q' clure
SFX xK clure cluse/L'D'Q' clure
SFX xK clure cluses/D'Q' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clut/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluons/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluais/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluait/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluiez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluaient/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clûmes/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clûtes/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurai/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluras/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clura/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurons/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluront/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurais/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurait/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clurions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluriez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluraient/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clue/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clues/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clusse/n'q'j'l' clure
SFX xK clure clusses/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clût/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clussions/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clussiez/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clussent/n'q'l' clure
SFX xK clure clus/n'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluons/n'l' clure
SFX xK clure cluez/n'l' clure

SFX xL Y 44
SFX xL clure clure/n'q'd'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluant/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clus/L'D'Q' inclure
SFX xL clure cluse/L'D'Q' inclure
SFX xL clure cluses/D'Q' inclure
SFX xL clure clu/L'D'Q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clus/D'Q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clue/L'D'Q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clues/D'Q' [eo].clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clut/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluons/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluais/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure cluait/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure cluions/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluiez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluaient/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clûmes/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure clûtes/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure clurent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurai/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure cluras/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clura/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurons/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure clurez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluront/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurais/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clurait/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clurions/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure cluriez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure cluraient/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clue/n'q'j'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clues/n'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clusse/n'q'j'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clusses/n'q'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure clût/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clussions/n'q'l't' clure
SFX xL clure clussiez/n'q'l'm' clure
SFX xL clure clussent/n'q'l'm't's' clure
SFX xL clure clus/n'l'm't' clure
SFX xL clure cluons/n'l' clure
SFX xL clure cluez/n'l'm' clure

SFX xM N 14
SFX xM ourdre ourdant sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourd sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdent sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdait sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdaient sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdit sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdirent sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdra sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdront sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdrait sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdraient sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourde sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdît sourdre
SFX xM ourdre ourdissent sourdre
