gc_lang/fr/oxt/Dictionnaires/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.dic
boire/xC
conclure/xL
croire/xA
emboire/xD
exclure/xL
inclure/xL
mécroire/xA
occlure/xK
reboire/xC
reclure/xJ
sourdre/xM
